Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,251
Labeling, defined.

Labeling shall mean the display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container of an article of food or which accompanies the article at the time of sale.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.10;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 20.